New York, session 2025-2026, A8680.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general city law is amended by adding a new section 2 18-e to read as follows: 3 § 18-e. Additional notification requirements for cities seeking to 4 cease fluoridation. No city that fluoridates a public water supply or 5 causes a public water supply to become fluoridated shall discontinue the 6 addition of a fluoride compound to such public water supply unless such 7 city has first complied with section eleven hundred-a of the public 8 health law. Such city shall publish a notice including the date of such 9 discontinuance in local newspapers and on the city's website and social 10 media pages at least ninety days before the date of such discontinuance. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13230-02-5